Utah statutes.
39-7-103.   Application of this chapter.

(1)  This chapter shall apply to all service members on military orders who are unable to perform, continue, or complete civil obligations due to military service.

(2)  This chapter does not apply to military service performed under orders issued pursuant to Title 10 or Title 32, United States Code.

(3)  Proper application of this chapter shall suspend or postpone actions upon those obligations until 60 days after discharge from active, full-time, military service.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 1997 General Session

